Hawaii statutes.
§571-8.2 Salary of district family judges.
The salary of each district family court judge of the various district family
courts of the State shall be the same as that of district court judges under
section 604-2.5.

Whenever the chief justice appoints a district
family court judge of any of the various district family courts of the State to
serve temporarily as a circuit court judge of any of the various circuit courts
of the State, the judge shall receive per diem compensation for the days on
which actual service is rendered based on the monthly rate of compensation paid
to a circuit court judge. For the purpose of determining per diem compensation
in this section, a month shall be deemed to consist of twenty-one days. [L
1973, c 219, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 58, §24; am L 1982, c 129, §23; am L 1986,
c 128, §20; am L 1988, c 396, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next